Utah statutes.
63I-1-102.   Agency defined -- Periodic termination of statutes and agencies
-- Legislative review.
(1)  As used in this chapter, "agency" means any state authority, board,
commission, department, division, office, or other agency, and the statute
that established it.
(2)  The Legislature finds that the state should not regulate any area unless
the regulation is necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the
public.
(3)  In order to make state government more productive and responsive to the
people, it is necessary to place many of the statutes and agencies of state
government under Part 2 of this chapter on a reauthorization schedule.  Any
statute or agency scheduled for termination under this chapter is terminated
unless the Legislature through affirmative act reauthorizes its existence.
The continued existence of a statute or agency subject to this chapter may not
be reauthorized for a period of more than ten years.
(4)  It is the purpose of this chapter to terminate any statute or agency that
is not meeting a clear public purpose, and to improve the ability of state
government to meet and fulfill legitimate public purposes.
